Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4316
(UDTA 16) Office of trust director.

(UDTA 16) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, the rules applicable to a trustee apply to a trust director regarding the following matters:

(1) acceptance under section 30-3857;

(2) giving of bond to secure performance under section 30-3858;

(3) reasonable compensation under section 30-3864;

(4) resignation under section 30-3861;

(5) removal under section 30-3862; and

(6) vacancy and appointment of successor under section 30-3860.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 16.